Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202017-167
Offstreet parking; city council; rules and regulations; contracts; rates.

Before the issuance of any revenue bonds as provided under section 17-165, the city council of a city of the second class shall make all necessary rules and regulations governing the use, operation, and control of such improvements. In carrying out sections 17-163 to 17-173, the city of the second class may make contracts with other departments of the city, or others, if such contracts are necessary and needed for the payment of the revenue bonds authorized under section 17-165 and for the successful operation of the parking facilities. The city council shall also establish and maintain equitable rates or charges for such services sufficient in amount to pay for the cost of operation, repair, and upkeep of the facilities to be purchased, acquired, or leased and the principal of and interest on any revenue bonds issued pursuant to sections 17-163 to 17-173. The city council may also make any other agreements with the purchasers of the bonds for the security of the issuing city and the purchasers of such bonds not in contravention with sections 17-163 to 17-173.

Laws 1957, c. 29, § 5, p. 187;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 55.